New York, session 2025-2026, A717.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 150.05 of the penal law, as amended by chapter 225 2 of the laws of 1979, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 150.05 Arson in the fourth degree. 4 1. A person is guilty of arson in the fourth degree when [he] such 5 person: 6 (a) recklessly damages a building or motor vehicle by intentionally 7 starting a fire or causing an explosion[.]; or 8 (b) damages a building or motor vehicle by fire or by explosion in the 9 course of the commission or attempted commission of a felony as defined 10 in article two hundred twenty of this chapter. 11 2. In any prosecution under this section, it is an affirmative defense 12 that no person other than the defendant had a possessory or proprietary 13 interest in the building or motor vehicle. 14 Arson in the fourth degree is a class E felony. 15 § 2. Section 150.10 of the penal law, as amended by chapter 225 of the 16 laws of 1979, is amended to read as follows: 17 § 150.10 Arson in the third degree. 18 1. A person is guilty of arson in the third degree when [he] such 19 person: 20 (a) intentionally damages a building or motor vehicle by starting a 21 fire or causing an explosion[.]; or EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02295-01-5 A. 717 2 1 (b) recklessly damages a building or motor vehicle by fire or by 2 explosion in the course of the commission or attempted commission of a 3 felony as defined in article two hundred twenty of this chapter. 4 2. In any prosecution under this section, it is an affirmative defense 5 that (a) no person other than the defendant had a possessory or proprie- 6 tary interest in the building or motor vehicle, or if other persons had 7 such interests, all of them consented to the defendant's conduct, and 8 (b) the defendant's sole intent was to destroy or damage the building or 9 motor vehicle for a lawful and proper purpose, and (c) the defendant had 10 no reasonable ground to believe that [his] such defendant's conduct 11 might endanger the life or safety of another person or damage another 12 building or motor vehicle. 13 Arson in the third degree is a class C felony. 14 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.